Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-106 Cooperation of officers and
employees. (a) Any officer, manager, director, trustee, owner, employee,
or agent of any insurer, or any other persons with authority over, or in charge
of any segment of the insurer's affairs, shall cooperate with the commissioner
or the receiver in any proceeding under this article or any investigation
preliminary to the proceeding. The term person as used in this section, shall
include any person who exercises control directly or indirectly over activities
of an insurer through any holding company or other affiliate of the insurer.
To cooperate shall include, but shall not be limited to the following:

(1) To reply promptly in writing to any inquiry from
the commissioner or the receiver requesting such a reply; and

(2) To make available and deliver to the commissioner
or receiver any books, accounts, documents, or other records, or information or
property of or pertaining to the insurer and in its possession, custody or
control.

(b) No person shall obstruct or interfere with
the commissioner in the conduct of any delinquency proceeding or any
investigation preliminary or incidental thereto.

(c) This section does not make it illegal to
resist by legal proceedings the petition for liquidation or other delinquency
proceedings, or other orders.

(d) Any person included within subsection (a)
who fails to cooperate with the commissioner, or any person who obstructs or
interferes with the commissioner in the conduct of any delinquency proceeding
or any investigation preliminary or incidental thereto, or who violates any
order the commissioner issued validly under this article may:

(1) Be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding $10,000
or to be imprisoned for a term of not more than one year, or both; or

(2) After a hearing, be subject to the imposition by
the commissioner, of a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 and shall be subject
further to the revocation or suspension of any insurance licenses issued by the
commissioner. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next